tr: Klavye standı kat sayısı: Tek katmanlı; Üç katmanlı; İki katmanlı; Diğer
el: Επίπεδα βάσης στήριξης πληκτρολογίου: Ενός επιπέδου; Τριών επιπέδων; Δύο επιπέδων; Άλλο
pl: Poziomy statywu na keyboard: Jednopoziomowy; Trzypoziomowy; Dwupoziomowy; Inne
sk-SK: Úrovne stojanu na kláves: Jednoúrovňové; Trojúrovňové; Dvojúrovňové; Iné
sl-SI: Nadstropja stojala za klaviature: Ena raven; Tri ravni; Dve ravni; Drugo
nl: Niveaus toetsenbordstandaard: Enkel niveau; Drie niveaus; Twee niveaus; Anders
zh-TW: 鍵盤架層數: 單層; 三層; 雙層; 其他
ko: 키보드 스탠드 단수: 1단; 3단; 2단; 기타
ro-RO: Număr de niveluri pentru suportul de claviatură: Un nivel; Trei niveluri; Două niveluri; Altele
bg-BG: Нива на стойката за клавиатура: С едно ниво; С три нива; С две нива; Друго
de: Keyboardständer-Ebenen: Einzelebene; Drei Ebenen; Zwei Ebenen; Sonstige
sv: Plan på keyboardställ: En nivå; Tre nivåer; Två nivåer; Övrigt
vi: Số tầng giá đỡ bàn phím: Tầng đơn; Ba tầng; Hai tầng; Khác
ru: Ярусы стойки для клавиатуры: Один ярус; Три яруса; Два яруса; Другое
cs: Úrovně stojanů na klávesy: Jednoúrovňové; Tříúrovňové; Dvouúrovňové; Jiné
hr-HR: Tiersi stalak za tipkovnicu: Jedna razina; Tri razine; Dvije razine; Ostalo
nb: Nivåer på keyboard-stativ: Ett nivå; Tre nivåer; To nivåer; Annet
zh-CN: 键盘支架层数: 单层; 三层; 双层; 其他
ja: キーボードスタンドティア: 1段; 3段; 2段; その他
hu: Billentyűs állvány szintjei: Egyszintes; Háromszintes; Kétszintes; Egyéb
fi: Kosketinsoittimen telineen soittotasot: Yksitasoinen; Kolmitasoinen; Kaksitasoinen; Muu
th: จำนวนชั้นของขาตั้งคีย์บอร์ด: ชั้นเดียว; สามชั้น; สองชั้น; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Klaviatūros stovo lygiai: Vienos pakopos; Trijų pakopų; Dviejų pakopų; Kita
da: Niveauer for keyboardstativ: Enkelt niveau; Tre niveauer; To niveauer; Andet
es: Niveles del soporte para teclado: Un nivel; Tres niveles; Dos niveles; Otro
it: Livelli dello stand per tastiera: Livello singolo; Tre livelli; Due livelli; Altro
en: Keyboard stand tiers: Single-tier; Three-tier; Two-tier; Other
pt-PT: Níveis do suporte para teclado: Um nível; Três níveis; Dois níveis; Outro
pt-BR: Níveis do suporte para teclado: Um nível; Três níveis; Dois níveis; Outros
fr: Niveaux de support pour clavier: À un niveau; À trois niveaux; À deux niveaux; Autre